Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6310.04
Fees.

The department shall establish and collect fees for issuance and renewal of licenses as provided in sections 38-151 to 38-157 for individuals licensed under section 71-6310.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1254.